California, session 20252026, AB1367.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10014 is added to the Water Code, to read:10014. The department shall amend The California Water Plan to state that water storage is the preferred method to be used by the state to increase the amount of water available in future years to meet increased water demands by urban, agricultural, and environmental interests.